Hawaii statutes.
§27-43 Office of enterprise
technology services; chief information officer; information technology steering
committee; establishment; responsibilities. (a) There is established
within the department of accounting and general services the office of enterprise
technology services, which shall be headed by a full-time chief information
officer to organize, manage, and oversee statewide information technology
governance. The chief information officer shall be appointed by the governor
as provided in section 26-34. The chief information officer shall report
directly to the governor and, in conjunction with the information technology
steering committee, shall:

(1) Develop, implement, and manage statewide
information technology governance;

(2) Develop, implement, and manage the
state information technology strategic plans;

(3) Develop and implement statewide
technology standards;

(4) Work with each executive branch
department and agency to develop and maintain its respective multi-year
information technology strategic and tactical plans and road maps that are part
of the State's overall information technology strategic plans, road maps, and
directions;

(5) Coordinate each executive branch
department and agency's information technology budget request, forecast, and
procurement purchase to ensure compliance with the department or agency's
strategic plan and road map and with the office of enterprise technology
services' information technology governance processes and enterprise
architecture policies and standards, including policies and standards for
systems, services, hardware, software, and security management;

(6) Report annually to the governor and the
legislature on the status and implementation of the state information
technology strategic plan;

(7) Perform other necessary or desirable
functions to facilitate the intent of this section;

(8) Employ persons exempt from chapters 76
and 89;

(9) Provide centralized computer information
management and processing services, coordination in the use of all information
processing equipment, software, facilities, and services in the executive
branch of the State, and consultation and support services in the use of
information processing and management technologies to improve the efficiency,
effectiveness, and productivity of state government programs;

(10) Establish,
coordinate, and manage a program to provide a means for public access to public
information and develop and operate an information network in conjunction with
overall plans for establishing a communication backbone for state government;
and

(11) Adopt
rules, pursuant to chapter 91, necessary for the purposes of this part.

(b) There is established an information
technology steering committee to assist the chief information officer in
developing the State's information technology standards and policies, including
but not limited to:

(1) Assisting the chief information officer in
developing and implementing the state information technology strategic plans;

(2) Assessing executive branch departments' progress
in meeting the objectives defined in the state information technology strategic
plans and identifying best practices for shared or consolidated services;

(3) Ensuring technology projects are selected based
on their potential impact and risk to the State, as well as their strategic
value;

(4) Ensuring that executive branch departments
maintain sufficient tools to assess the value and benefits of technology
initiatives;

(5) Assisting the chief information officer in
developing state information technology standards and policies; and

(6) Clarifying the roles, responsibilities, and
authority of the office of enterprise technology services, specifically as it
relates to its statewide duties.

The information technology steering committee
shall consist of eleven members, with four members to be appointed by the
senate president, four members to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, one member to be appointed by the chief justice, and one
member to be appointed by the governor, and shall include representatives from
executive branch departments, including large user agencies such as the
department of education and the University of Hawaii; the judiciary; the
legislature; and private individuals. The chief information officer shall serve
as the chair of the committee and shall ensure that the committee is evaluated
periodically.

(c) There is established within the department
of accounting and general services a special fund to be known as the shared
services technology special fund to be administered and expended by the chief
information officer for the purposes of this subsection. Three per cent of the
receipts collected from special funds pursuant to section 36-27 shall be
deposited into the shared services technology special fund. Any law to the
contrary notwithstanding, the moneys in the fund shall be used to fund the
operations of the chief information officer and the information technology
steering committee, including the employment and training of staff and any
other activities deemed necessary by the chief information officer to carry out
the purposes of this section.

(d) The chief information officer and the
comptroller may raise funds to defray administrative costs and may accept
donations of money and personal property on behalf of the information
technology steering committee; provided that all donations accepted from
private sources shall be expended in the manner prescribed by the contributor,
and all moneys received shall be deposited into the information technology trust
account. The chief information officer may also directly receive donated
personal services and personal property for which funding is not required.

(e) The chief information officer shall submit
an annual report to the governor and the legislature no later than twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature on the
activities and programs under the authority of the chief information officer
and the information technology steering committee, and the expenditures of all moneys
received from all sources and deposited into the information technology trust
account and the shared services technology special fund. [L 2010, c 200, §2; am
L 2011, c 84, §2; am L 2012, c 224, §1; am L 2016, c 58, §3]

Note

Consolidation of functions, duties, etc. of the office of
information management and technology and the information and communication
services division under the office of enterprise technology services. L 2016,
c 58, §§8 to 11.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next